Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-616
License; solicitor's certificate; appeals; procedure.

Any refusal to grant a license or solicitor's certificate under the Collection Agency Act or the suspension or revocation of a license or solicitor's certificate may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 20, p. 1601;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,177;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 76;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 16.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.